Utah statutes.
78B-1-106.   Master jury list -- Inclusive -- Review -- Renewal -- Public
examination.
(1)  The Judicial Council shall designate one or more regularly maintained
lists of persons residing in each county as the source lists for the master
jury list for that county.  The master jury list shall be as inclusive of the
adult population of the county as is reasonably practicable.
(2)  The Judicial Council shall by rule provide for the biannual review of the
master jury list to evaluate its inclusiveness of the adult population of the
county.
(3)  Not less than once every six months the Administrative Office of the
Courts shall renew the master jury list for a county by incorporating any
additions, deletions, or amendments to the source lists.  The Administrative
Office of the Courts shall include any additional source lists designated by
the Judicial Council upon the next renewal of the master jury list for a
county.
(4)  The person having custody, possession, or control of any list used in
compiling the master jury list shall make the list available to the
Administrative Office of the Courts at all reasonable times without charge.
